New York, session 2025-2026, A8134.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-d to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-d. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Fort 4 de la Presentation. All that portion of the state highway system consti- 5 tuting state route sixty-eight beginning at its intersection with Albany 6 Avenue, continuing in a generally northeasterly direction, and terminat- 7 ing at its intersection with Commerce Street in the city of Ogdensburg, 8 county of St. Lawrence, shall be dedicated to Fort de la Presentation. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Fort de la Presentation". 13 However, to avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of 14 commerce, the dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act 15 shall be one of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway 16 shall not be changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11702-04-5